Wyoming, session 2025, SF0072.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-2-304(b)(viii), 21-4-301(a) and
21-13-307(a)(ii)(intro) are amended to read:
SF0072

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0328

21-2-304. Duties of the state board of education.

(b) In addition to subsection (a) of this section and
any other duties assigned to it by law, the state board
shall:

(viii) Approve or disapprove alternative
scheduling for school districts requesting to commence a
school year before Labor Day, to recess a school year after
Memorial Day or to operate for fewer than one hundred
seventy-five (175) one hundred sixty-five (165) days in a
school year, but no schedule shall be approved which
reduces the minimum pupil-teacher contact time defined by
the state board. The state board shall establish by rule
for grades kindergarten through twelve (12) minimum
pupil-teacher contact time requirements, which may include
instruction outside of the physical classroom through
virtual education or other equivalent methods the state
board deems appropriate;

21-4-301. Schools to be free and accessible to all
children; minimum school year.
SF0072

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0328

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the public
schools of each school district in the state shall at all
times be equally free and accessible to all children
resident therein of five (5) years of age as of August 1,
or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under
W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii), of the year in which they may
register in kindergarten as provided in W.S. 21-4-302(b)
and under the age of twenty-one (21), subject to
regulations of the board of trustees. Each school year
shall commence after Labor Day and recess not later than
Memorial Day in the immediately succeeding calendar year
unless an alternative schedule has been approved by the
state board. Each school district shall operate its schools
and its classes for a minimum of one hundred seventy-five
(175) one hundred sixty-five (165) days each school year
unless an alternative schedule has been approved by the
state board. Prior to submission of a proposed alternative
schedule to the state board, the board of trustees shall
hold at least two (2) advertised public meetings within the
district, at which the board shall present the proposed
alternative schedule and respond to public questions and
comments. Any school district operating under an
SF0072

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0328
alternative schedule shall annually evaluate the
effectiveness of that schedule in meeting the educational
goals and purposes for which the schedule was adopted.

21-13-307. Eligibility to share in distribution of
money from foundation account; mandatory financial
reporting.

(a) Each district which meets the following
requirements is eligible to share in the distribution of
funds from the foundation account:

(ii) Operated all schools for a term of at least
one hundred eighty-five (185) one hundred seventy days
(170) days or the number of days or equivalent hours
authorized under an alternative schedule approved by the
state board during the previous school year. If the school
term of any school in a district was less than one hundred
eighty-five (185) one hundred seventy days (170) days or
less than the total number of days authorized under an
alternative schedule approved by the state board, the
amount allotted per average daily membership (ADM) under
W.S. 21-13-309 for the school shall be in proportion to the
SF0072

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0328
length of the term the school actually operated, unless
caused by closures of schools:

Section 2. The modifications to the school year and
operation days of schools contained in section 1 of this
act shall be effective school year 2026-2027 and each
school year thereafter.

Section 3. No school district shall decrease any
teacher's salary as a result of this act.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0072